Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4606 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Insurance Commissioner shall have the authority
to implement, establish, create, administer, or otherwise operate an
exchange, promulgate rules, and apply to the United States Secretary
of Health and Human Services for a waiver pursuant to Section 1332
of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C.,
Section 18052).
B. "Exchange" means a state, federal, or partnership exchange
or marketplace operating in Oklahoma pursuant to Section 1311 of the
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4606.1 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Insurance Department, to be designated the "State-based
Exchange Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of any monies
deposited to the fund for the creation, implementation,
administration, and operation of the State-based Exchange as
authorized in subsection A of Section 1 of this act. All monies
accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Department for the creation,
implementation, administration, and operation of the State-based
Exchange. Warrants for expenditures from the revolving fund shall
be drawn by the State Treasurer, based on claims signed by an
authorized employee or employees of the Insurance Department, and
filed with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services.
B. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, all monies,
including but not limited to user fees, paid to or collected by the
Insurance Commissioner in relation to the State-based Exchange shall
be deposited in the State-based Exchange Revolving Fund. Monies
shall not lapse, unless otherwise specified under federal funding or
federal grant, or a grant or funds from another source, or be
transferred to the State Insurance Commissioner Revolving Fund or
other state funds and shall not be redistributed.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1512 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1512 Page 3